California statutes. Civil Code
(B) Driver’s license number, California identification card number, tax identification number, passport number, military identification number, or other unique identification number issued on a government document commonly used to verify the identity of
 a specific individual.

(C) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination with any required security code, access code, or password that would permit access to an individual’s financial account.

(D) Medical information.

(E) Health insurance information.

(F) Unique biometric data generated from measurements or technical analysis of human body characteristics, such as a fingerprint, retina, or iris image, used to authenticate a specific individual. Unique biometric data does not include a physical or digital photograph, unless used or stored for facial recognition purposes.

(G) Information or data collected through the use or operation of an automated license plate recognition system, as defined in
 Section 1798.90.5.

(H) Genetic data.

(2) A username or email address, in combination with a password or security question and answer that would permit access to an online account.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section, “personal information” does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.

(2) For purposes of this section, “medical information” means any information regarding an individual’s medical history, mental or physical condition, or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional.

(3) For purposes of this section, “health insurance information”
 means an individual’s health insurance policy number or subscriber identification number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to identify the individual, or any information in an individual’s application and claims history, including any appeals records.

(4) For purposes of this section, “encrypted” means rendered unusable, unreadable, or indecipherable to an unauthorized person through a security technology or methodology generally accepted in the field of information security.

(5) For purposes of this section, “genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis of a biological sample of an individual, or from another source enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns genetic material. Genetic material
 includes, but is not limited to, deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles,
 genomes, alterations or modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), uninterpreted data that results from analysis of the biological sample or other source, and any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.

(i) For purposes of this section, “notice” may be provided by one of the following methods:

(1) Written notice.

(2) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(3) Substitute notice, if the agency demonstrates that the cost of providing notice would exceed two hundred
 fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or that the affected class of subject persons to be notified exceeds 500,000, or the agency does not have sufficient contact information. Substitute notice shall consist of all of the following:

(A) Email notice when the agency has an email address for the subject persons.

(B) Conspicuous posting, for a minimum of 30 days, of the notice on the agency’s internet website, if the agency maintains one. For purposes of this subparagraph, conspicuous posting on the agency’s internet website means providing a link to the notice on the home page or first significant
 page after entering the internet website that is in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the link.

(C) Notification to major statewide media and the Office of Information Security within the Department of Technology.

(4) In the case of a breach of the security of the system involving personal information defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) for an online account, and no other personal information defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), the agency may comply with this section by providing the security breach notification in electronic or other form that directs the person whose personal
 information has been breached to promptly change the person’s password and security question or answer, as applicable, or to take other steps appropriate to protect the online account with the agency and all other online accounts for which the person uses the same username or email address and password or security question or answer.

(5) In the case of a breach of the security of the system involving personal information defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) for login credentials of an email account furnished by the agency, the agency shall not comply with this section by providing the security breach notification to that email address, but may, instead, comply with this section by providing notice by another method described in this subdivision or by clear and conspicuous notice delivered to the resident online when the
 resident is connected to the online account from an Internet Protocol address or online location from which the agency knows the resident customarily accesses the account.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (i), an agency that maintains its own notification procedures as part of an information security policy for the treatment of personal information and is otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of this part shall be deemed to be in compliance with the notification requirements of this section if it notifies subject persons in accordance with its policies in the event of a breach of security of the system.

(k) Notwithstanding the exception specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.3, for purposes of this section, “agency” includes a local
 agency, as defined in Section 7920.510 of the Government Code.

(l) For purposes of this section, “encryption key” and “security credential” mean the confidential key or process designed to render the data usable, readable, and decipherable.

(m) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Bar of California shall comply with this section. This subdivision shall not be construed to apply other provisions of this chapter to the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 419, Sec. 14.   (AB 2958)   Effective September 18, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Access to Records and Administrative Remedies [1798.30. - 1798.44.]

1798.30.

Each agency shall either adopt regulations or publish guidelines specifying procedures to be followed in order fully to implement each of the rights of individuals set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.32.

Each individual shall have the right to inquire and be notified as to whether the agency maintains a record about himself or herself. Agencies shall take reasonable steps to assist individuals in making their requests sufficiently specific.

Any notice sent to an individual which in any way indicates that the agency maintains any record concerning that individual
 shall include the title and business address of the agency official responsible for maintaining the records, the procedures to be followed to gain access to the records, and the procedures to be followed for an individual to contest the contents of these records unless the individual has received this notice from the agency during the past year.

In implementing the right conferred by this section, an agency may specify in its rules or regulations reasonable times, places, and requirements for identifying an individual who requests access to a record, and for disclosing the contents of a record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 33.6.   Effective March 7, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.33.

Each agency may establish fees to be charged, if any, to an individual for making copies of a record. Such fees shall exclude the cost of any search for and review of the record, and shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10) per page, unless the agency fee for copying is established by statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.34.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each agency shall permit any individual upon request and proper identification to inspect all the personal information in any record containing personal information and maintained by reference to an identifying particular assigned to the individual within 30 days of the agency’s receipt of the request for active records, and within 60 days of the agency’s receipt of the request for records that are geographically dispersed or which are inactive and in central storage. Failure to respond within these time limits shall be deemed denial. In addition, the individual shall be
 permitted to inspect any personal information about himself or herself where it is maintained by reference to an identifying particular other than that of the individual, if the agency knows or should know that the information exists. The individual also shall be permitted to inspect the accounting made pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 1798.25).

(b) The agency shall permit the individual, and, upon the individual’s request, another person of the individual’s own choosing to inspect all the personal information in the record and have an exact copy made of all or any portion thereof within 15 days of the inspection. It may require the individual to furnish a written statement authorizing disclosure of the individual’s record to another person of the individual’s choosing.

(c) The agency shall present the information in the record in a form reasonably comprehensible to
 the general public.

(d) Whenever an agency is unable to access a record by reference to name only, or when access by name only would impose an unreasonable administrative burden, it may require the individual to submit such other identifying information as will facilitate access to the record.

(e) When an individual is entitled under this chapter to gain access to the information in a record containing personal information, the information or a true copy thereof shall be made available to the individual at a location near the residence of the individual or by mail, whenever reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.35.

Each agency shall permit an individual to request in writing an amendment of a record and, shall within 30 days of the date of receipt of such request:

(a) Make each correction in accordance with the individual’s request of any portion of a record which the individual believes is not accurate, relevant, timely, or complete and inform the individual of the corrections made in accordance with their request; or

(b) Inform the individual of its refusal to amend the record in accordance with such individual’s request, the reason for the refusal,
 the procedures established by the agency for the individual to request a review by the head of the agency or an official specifically designated by the head of the agency of the refusal to amend, and the name, title, and business address of the reviewing official.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.36.

Each agency shall permit any individual who disagrees with the refusal of the agency to amend a record to request a review of such refusal by the head of the agency or an official specifically designated by the head of such agency, and, not later than 30 days from the date on which the individual requests such review, complete such review and make a final determination unless, for good cause shown, the head of the agency extends such review period by 30 days. If, after such review, the reviewing official refuses to amend the record in accordance with the request, the agency shall permit the individual to file with the agency a statement of reasonable length setting
 forth the reasons for the individual’s disagreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.37.

The agency, with respect to any disclosure containing information about which the individual has filed a statement of disagreement, shall clearly note any portion of the record which is disputed and make available copies of such individual’s statement and copies of a concise statement of the reasons of the agency for not making the amendment to any person or agency to whom the disputed record has been or is disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.38.

If information, including letters of recommendation, compiled for the purpose of determining suitability, eligibility, or qualifications for employment, advancement, renewal of appointment or promotion, status as adoptive parents, or for the receipt of state contracts, or for licensing purposes, was received with the promise or, prior to July 1, 1978, with the understanding that the identity of the source of the information would be held in confidence and the source is not in a supervisory position with respect to the individual to whom the record pertains, the agency shall fully inform the individual of all personal information about that
 individual without identification of the source. This may be done by providing a copy of the text of the material with only such deletions as are necessary to protect the identity of the source or by providing a comprehensive summary of the substance of the material. Whichever method is used, the agency shall insure that full disclosure is made to the subject of any personal information that could reasonably in any way reflect or convey anything detrimental, disparaging, or threatening to an individual’s reputation, rights, benefits, privileges, or qualifications, or be used by an agency to make a determination that would affect an individual’s rights, benefits, privileges, or qualifications. In institutions of higher education, “supervisory positions” shall not be deemed to include chairpersons of academic departments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.39.

Sections 1798.35, 1798.36, and 1798.37 shall not apply to any record evidencing property rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.40.

This chapter shall not be construed to require an agency to disclose personal information to the individual to whom the information pertains, if the information meets any of the following criteria:

(a) Is compiled for the purpose of identifying individual criminal offenders and alleged offenders and consists only of identifying data and notations of arrests, the nature and disposition of criminal charges, sentencing, confinement, release, and parole and probation status.

(b) Is compiled for the purpose of a criminal
 investigation of suspected criminal activities, including reports of informants and investigators, and associated with an identifiable individual.

(c) Is contained in any record which could identify an individual and which is compiled at any stage of the process of enforcement of the criminal laws, from the arrest or indictment stage through release from supervision and including the process of extradition or the exercise of executive clemency.

(d) Is maintained for the purpose of an investigation of an individual’s fitness for licensure or public employment, or of a grievance or complaint, or a suspected civil offense, so long as the information is withheld only so as not to compromise the investigation, or a related investigation. The identities of individuals who provided information for the investigation may be withheld pursuant to Section 1798.38.

(e) Would compromise the objectivity or fairness of a competitive examination for appointment or promotion in public service, or to determine fitness for licensure, or to determine scholastic aptitude.

(f) Pertains to the physical or psychological condition of the individual, if the agency determines that disclosure would be detrimental to the individual. The information shall, upon the individual’s written authorization, be disclosed to a licensed medical practitioner or psychologist designated by the individual. 

(g) Relates to the settlement of claims for work related illnesses or injuries and is maintained exclusively by the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(h) Is required by statute to be withheld from the individual to whom it pertains.

This section shall not be construed to deny an individual access to information relating to him or her if access is allowed by another statute or decisional law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.41.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the agency determines that information requested pursuant to Section 1798.34 is exempt from access, it shall inform the individual in writing of the agency’s finding that disclosure is not required by law.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), each agency shall conduct a review of its determination that particular information is exempt from access pursuant to Section 1798.40, within 30 days from the receipt of a request by an individual directly affected by the determination, and inform the individual in writing
 of the findings of the review. The review shall be conducted by the head of the agency or an official specifically designated by the head of the agency.

(c) If the agency believes that compliance with subdivision (a) would seriously interfere with attempts to apprehend persons who are wanted for committing a crime or attempts to prevent the commission of a crime or would endanger the life of an informant or other person submitting information contained in the record, it may petition the presiding judge of the superior court of the county in which the record is maintained to issue an ex parte order authorizing the agency to respond to the individual that no record is maintained. All proceedings before the court shall be in camera. If the presiding judge finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe that compliance with subdivision (a) will seriously interfere with attempts to apprehend persons who are wanted for committing a crime or
 attempts to prevent the commission of a crime or will endanger the life of an informant or other person submitting information contained in the record, the judge shall issue an order authorizing the agency to respond to the individual that no record is maintained by the agency. The order shall not be issued for longer than 30 days but can be renewed at 30-day intervals. If a request pursuant to this section is received after the expiration of the order, the agency must either respond pursuant to subdivision (a) or seek a new order pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1798.40 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.42.

In disclosing information contained in a record to an individual, an agency shall not disclose any personal information relating to another individual which may be contained in the record. To comply with this section, an agency shall, in disclosing information, delete from disclosure such information as may be necessary. This section shall not be construed to authorize withholding the identities of sources except as provided in Sections 1798.38 and 1798.40.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1798.41 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.43.

In disclosing information contained in a record to an individual, an agency need not disclose any information pertaining to that individual which is exempt under Section 1798.40. To comply with this section, an agency may, in disclosing personal information contained in a record, delete from the disclosure any exempt information.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1798.42 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.44.

This article applies to the rights of an individual to whom personal information pertains and not to the authority or right of any other person, agency, other state governmental entity, or governmental entity to obtain this information.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1798.43 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Civil Remedies [1798.45. - 1798.53.]

1798.45.

An individual may bring a civil action against an agency whenever such agency does any of the following:

(a) Refuses to comply with an individual’s lawful request to inspect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1798.34.

(b) Fails to maintain any record concerning any individual with such accuracy, relevancy, timeliness, and completeness as is necessary to assure fairness in any determination relating to the qualifications, character, rights, opportunities of, or benefits to the individual that may be made on the basis of such record, if,
 as a proximate result of such failure, a determination is made which is adverse to the individual.

(c) Fails to comply with any other provision of this chapter, or any rule promulgated thereunder, in such a way as to have an adverse effect on an individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.46.

In any suit brought under the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.45:

(a) The court may enjoin the agency from withholding the records and order the production to the complainant of any agency records improperly withheld from the complainant. In such a suit the court shall determine the matter de novo, and may examine the contents of any agency records in camera to determine whether the records or any portion thereof may be withheld as being exempt from the individual’s right of access and the burden is on the agency to sustain its action. 

(b) The court shall assess against the agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any suit under this section in which the complainant has prevailed. A party may be considered to have prevailed even though he or she does not prevail on all issues or against all parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.47.

Any agency that fails to comply with any provision of this chapter may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make any order or judgment as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by an agency of any practices which violate this chapter.

Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General, or
 any district attorney in this state, in the name of the people of the State of California whether upon his or her own complaint, or of a member of the general public, or by any individual acting in his or her own behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21, Sec. 33.7.   Effective March 7, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.48.

In any suit brought under the provisions of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1798.45, the agency shall be liable to the individual in an amount equal to the sum of:

(a) Actual damages sustained by the individual, including damages for mental suffering.

(b) The costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.49.

An action to enforce any liability created under Sections 1798.45 to 1798.48, inclusive, may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the complainant resides, or has his principal place of business, or in which the defendant’s records are situated, within two years from the date on which the cause of action arises, except that where a defendant has materially and willfully misrepresented any information required under this section to be disclosed to an individual who is the subject of the information and the information so misrepresented is material to the establishment of the defendant’s liability to that individual under this section,
 the action may be brought at any time within two years after discovery by the complainant of the misrepresentation. Nothing in Sections 1798.45 to 1798.48, inclusive, shall be construed to authorize any civil action by reason of any injury sustained as the result of any information practice covered by this chapter prior to July 1, 1978.

The rights and remedies set forth in this chapter shall be deemed to be nonexclusive and are in addition to all those rights and remedies which are otherwise available under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.50.

A civil action shall not lie under this article based upon an allegation that an opinion which is subjective in nature, as distinguished from a factual assertion, about an individual’s qualifications, in connection with a personnel action concerning such an individual, was not accurate, relevant, timely, or complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.51.

Where a remedy other than those provided in Articles 8 and 9 is provided by law but is not available because of lapse of time an individual may obtain a correction to a record under this chapter but such correction shall not operate to revise or restore a right or remedy not provided by this chapter that has been barred because of lapse of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.53.

Any person, other than an employee of the state or of a local government agency acting solely in his or her official capacity, who intentionally discloses information, not otherwise public, which they know or should reasonably know was obtained from personal information maintained by a state agency or from “records” within a “system of records” (as these terms are defined in the Federal Privacy Act of 1974 (P. L. 93-579; 5 U.S.C. 552a)) maintained by a federal government agency, shall be subject to a civil action, for invasion of privacy, by the individual to whom the information pertains.

In any
 successful action brought under this section, the complainant, in addition to any special or general damages awarded, shall be awarded a minimum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in exemplary damages as well as attorney’s fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in the suit.

The right, remedy, and cause of action set forth in this section shall be nonexclusive and is in addition to all other rights, remedies, and causes of action for invasion of privacy, inherent in Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Penalties [1798.55. - 1798.57.]

1798.55.

The intentional violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rules or regulations adopted thereunder, by an officer or employee of any agency shall constitute a cause for discipline, including termination of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.56.

Any person who willfully requests or obtains any record containing personal information from an agency under false pretenses shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.57.

Except for disclosures which are otherwise required or permitted by law, the intentional disclosure of medical, psychiatric, or psychological information in violation of the disclosure provisions of this chapter is punishable as a misdemeanor if the wrongful disclosure results in economic loss or personal injury to the individual to whom the information pertains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   Effective May 13, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Miscellaneous Provisions [1798.60. - 1798.69.]

1798.60.

An individual’s name and address may not be distributed for commercial purposes, sold, or rented by an agency unless such action is specifically authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.61.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the release of only names and addresses of persons possessing licenses to engage in professional occupations.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the release of only names and addresses of persons applying for licenses to engage in professional occupations for the sole purpose of providing those persons with informational materials relating to available professional educational materials or courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 962, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.62.

Upon written request of any individual, any agency which maintains a mailing list shall remove the individual’s name and address from such list, except that such agency need not remove the individual’s name if such name is exclusively used by the agency to directly contact the individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.63.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed so as to protect the rights of privacy arising under this chapter or under the Federal or State Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.64.

(a) Each agency record which is accepted by the Director of General Services for storage, processing, and servicing in accordance with provisions of the State Administrative Manual for the purposes of this chapter shall be considered to be maintained by the agency which deposited the record and shall continue to be subject to the provisions of this chapter. The Director of General Services shall not disclose the record except to the agency which maintains the record, or pursuant to rules established by such agency which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Each agency record pertaining to an identifiable individual which was or is transferred to the State Archives as a record which has sufficient historical or other value to warrant its continued preservation by the California state government, prior to or after July 1, 1978, shall, for the purposes of this chapter, be considered to be maintained by the archives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.66.

The time limits specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 1798. 30) may be extended to 60 days by the Franchise Tax Board if the following conditions exist:

(a) The request is made during the period January 1 through June 30; and 

(b) The records requested are stored on magnetic tape.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.67.

Where an agency has recorded a document creating a lien or encumbrance on real property in favor of the state, nothing herein shall prohibit any such agency from disclosing information relating to the identity of the person against whom such lien or encumbrance has been recorded for the purpose of distinguishing such person from another person bearing the same or a similar name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.68.

(a) Information which is permitted to be disclosed under the provisions of subdivision (e), (f), or (o), of Section 1798.24 shall be provided when requested by a district attorney.

A district attorney may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to require disclosure of information when an agency fails or refuses to provide the requested information within 10 working days of a request. The court may require the agency to permit inspection unless the public interest or good cause in withholding such records clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure.

(b) Disclosure of information to a district attorney under the provisions of this chapter shall effect no change in the status of the records under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 601.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.69.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the State Board of Equalization may not release the names and addresses of individuals who are registered with, or are holding licenses or permits issued by, the State Board of Equalization except to the extent necessary to verify resale certificates or to administer the tax and fee provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release by the State Board of Equalization to, or limit
 the use by, any federal or state agency, or local government, of any data collected by the board that is otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 962, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Construction With Other Laws [1798.70. - 1798.78.]

1798.70.

This chapter shall be construed to supersede any other provision of state law, including Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or any exemption in Section 7922.000 of the Government Code or in any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code, which authorizes any agency to withhold from an individual any record containing personal information that is otherwise accessible under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 46.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.71.

This chapter shall not be deemed to abridge or limit the rights of litigants, including parties to administrative proceedings, under the laws, or case law, of discovery of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.72.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the disclosure of any record containing personal information, other than to the subject of such records, in violation of any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.73.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deny or limit any right of privacy arising under Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.74.

The provisions of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 67110) of Part 40 of the Education Code shall, with regard to student records, prevail over the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.75.

This chapter shall not be deemed to supersede Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as to the provisions of Sections 1798.60, 1798.69, and 1798.70.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 47.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.76.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to revoke, modify, or alter in any manner any statutory provision or any judicial decision which (a) authorizes an individual to gain access to any law enforcement record, or (b) authorizes discovery in criminal or civil litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 709.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.77.

Each agency shall ensure that no record containing personal information shall be modified, transferred, or destroyed to avoid compliance with any of the provisions of this chapter. In the event that an agency fails to comply with the provisions of this section, an individual may bring a civil action and seek the appropriate remedies and damages in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 1798.45).

An agency shall not remove or destroy personal information about an individual who has requested access to the information before allowing the individual access to the record
 containing the information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.78.

This chapter shall not be deemed to supersede the provisions of Chapter 1299 of the Statutes of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 595, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.80. Identification Documents [1798.79. - 1798.795.]

1798.79.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a person or entity that intentionally remotely reads or attempts to remotely read a person’s identification document using radio frequency identification (RFID), for the purpose of reading that person’s identification document without that person’s knowledge and prior consent, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year, a fine of not
 more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) A person or entity that knowingly discloses, or causes to be disclosed, the operational system keys used in a contactless identification document system shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year, a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), or both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to:

(1) The reading of a person’s identification document for triage or medical care during a disaster and immediate hospitalization or immediate outpatient care directly related to a disaster, as defined by the local emergency medical services agency organized under Section 1797.200 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The reading of a person’s identification document by a health care professional for reasons relating to the health or safety of that person or an identification document issued to a patient by emergency services.

(3) The reading of an identification document of a person who is incarcerated in the state prison or a county jail, detained in a juvenile facility operated by the Division of Juvenile Facilities in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or housed in a mental health facility, pursuant to a court order after having been charged with a crime, or to a person pursuant to a court-ordered electronic monitoring.

(4) Law enforcement or government personnel who need to read a lost identification document when the owner is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent, or those parties specifically authorized by law enforcement or government personnel
 for the limited purpose of reading a lost identification document when the owner is unavailable for notice, knowledge, or consent.
